Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.510

After-school mathematics support program—Reports.

(1) The after-school mathematics support program is created to study the effects of intentional, skilled mathematics support included as part of an existing after-school activity program.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide grants to selected community-based, nonprofit organizations that provide after-school programs and include support for students to learn mathematics.

(3) Grant applicants must demonstrate the capacity to provide assistance in mathematics learning in the following ways:

(a) Identifying the mathematics content and instructional skill of the staff or volunteers assisting students;

(b) Identifying proposed learning strategies to be used, which could include computer-based instructional and skill practice programs and tutoring by adults or other students;

(c) Articulating the plan for connection with school mathematics teachers to coordinate student assistance; and

(d) Articulating the plan for assessing student and program success.

(4) Priority will be given to applicants that propose programs to serve middle school and junior high school students.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall evaluate program outcomes and report to the governor and the education committees of the legislature on the outcomes of the grants and make recommendations related to program continuation, program modification, and issues related to program sustainability and possible program expansion. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1, 2009.

[ 2007 c 396 s 3.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.